src/fst/stems/propernouns_newwords.lexc
LEXICON PROP_NEWWORDS
  PROP_NEWWORDS_ANTH ;
  PROP_NEWWORDS_INE ;
  PROP_NEWWORDS_ADE ;
  PROP_NEWWORDS_TYHI ;

LEXICON PROP_NEWWORDS_ANTH
Anne+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Anne PROP_1HANS1A ;
Mehka+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Mehka PROP_1HANS1A ;
Hellä+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Hellä PROP_1HERRAE ;
Mari+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Mari PROP_1HANS1A ;
Hurda+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:Hurda PROP_1HANS1A ;

Piitre+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Piitre PROP_2KERGE ;
Mihkli+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Mihkli PROP_2ARTIKLI ;
Katri+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Katri PROP_2ARTIKLI ;

Kallõv+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Ka%{lØ%}lõv PROP_9TUKWV ;
Sullõv+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Su%{lØ%}lõv PROP_9TUKWV ;
Ollõv+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:O%{lØ%}lõv PROP_9TUKWV ;

Pauĺ+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Mal:Pau%{lĺ%} PROP_38PULL1 ;
Hipṕ+N+Prop+Sem/Ant_Fem:Hipp PROP_38PAPP1 ;

Tsirgurada+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Tsirgura%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a PROP_44SWDA "_#a, #ta __Tsirgura|da_" ;
Tsirgutii+N+Prop:Tsirgut%{ei%}%{ei%} PROP_29HAEAE "_#, #d__Tsirguti̬i̬_" ;
Taivatii+N+Prop:%{ˋØ%}#Taivat%{ei%}%{ei%} PROP_29HAEAE "_#, #d__ˋTaivati̬i̬_" ;


Vana-Koiola+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Vana-Koiola PROP_1HANS1A ;
Vana-Rooma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Vana-Rooma PROP_1HANS1A ;
Õdagu-Rooma+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Õdagu-Rooma PROP_1HANS1A ;
Ekvatoriaal-Ginea+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Ekvatoriaal-Ginea PROP_1HANS1A ;
Lõunõ-Korea+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Lõunõ-Korea PROP_1HANS1A ;
Põh́a-Korea+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Põh́a-Korea PROP_1HANS1A ;
Õdagu-Ukraina+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Õdagu-Ukraina PROP_1HANS1A ;
Vana-Antsla+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Vana-Antsla PROP_1HANS1A ;
Vana-Kreeka+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Vana-Kreeka PROP_1HANS1A ;

Lõunõ-Ameeriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Lõunõ-Ameeri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Kesk-Ameeriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Kesk-Ameeri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Põh́a-Ameeriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Põh́a-Ameeri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Ladina-Ameeriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Ladina-Ameeri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Lõuna-Eesti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Lõuna-Eesti PROP_2ARTIKLI ;
Õdagu-Eesti+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Õdagu-Eesti PROP_2ARTIKLI ;
Iiri+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Iiri PROP_2ARTIKLI ;
Põh́a-Iiri+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Põh́a-Iiri PROP_2ARTIKLI ;
Afriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Afri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Hummogu-Afriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Hummogu-Afri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Lõunõ-Afriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Lõunõ-Afri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Õdagu-Afriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Õdagu-Afri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Kesk-Afriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Kesk-Afri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Põh́a-Afriga+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Põh́a-Afri%{kg%} PROP_10AMEERIGA ;
Õdagu-Viro+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Õdagu-Viro PROP_1HANS1A ;
Hummogu-Viro+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Hummogu-Viro PROP_1HANS1A ;
Lõunahummogu-Poola+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Lõunahummogu-Poola PROP_1HANS1A ;
Ütisriigiq+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Ütis#rii%{kḱg%} N_38REHK1_PL ;
Ütiskuningriiḱ+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:Ütis#kuning#rii%{kḱg%} N_38REHK1 ;
